Tennessee, session 114, HB1882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-201(f), is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting:
(3) The members of a state university board appointed by the governor on or
after the effective date of this act must be confirmed by joint resolution of the senate and
house of representatives prior to beginning a term of office.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-201(f)(2), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(D) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the terms of members appointed
pursuant to subdivision (f)(1)(B) begin on February 1 and expire six (6) years thereafter.
In order to align the terms of existing members with members appointed by the governor
on or after the effective date of this act, the terms of members appointed pursuant to
subdivision (f)(1)(B) who are serving a term on a state university board on the effective
date of this act are extended to January 31 immediately following the date on which the
member's term expires.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-201(f)(9)(A), is amended by
adding the following as new subdivisions:
(iii) Members appointed to the state university board for Tennessee State
University by the governor on or after the effective date of this act must be confirmed as
provided in subdivision (f)(3) prior to beginning a term of office; and
HB1882
010439
- 1 -

(iv) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the terms of members appointed
pursuant to subdivision (f)(1)(B) begin on February 1 and expire six (6) years thereafter.
In order to align the terms of existing members with members appointed by the governor
on or after the effective date of this act, the terms of members appointed pursuant to
subdivision (f)(1)(B) who are serving a term on the state university board for Tennessee
State University on the effective date of this act are extended to January 31 immediately
following the date on which the member's term expires;
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010439